Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-617.12
Delayed birth certificate; court order; clerk of the court; duties.

The clerk of the court shall forward any order made under section 71-617.11 to the department not later than the tenth day of the calendar month following the month in which it was entered. The order shall be registered by the department and shall constitute the certificate of birth.

Laws 1985, LB 42, § 19;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 151;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 426.